Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1221.
do enact as follows:AB1221,11Section 1. 7.33 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,2,427.33 (1) (c) “State agency” has the meaning given under s. 20.001 (1) and 3includes an authority created under subch. II of ch. 114 or ch. 231, 232, 233, 234, 4235, or 237.AB1221,25Section 2. 13.172 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,2,11613.172 (1) In this section, “agency” means an office, department, agency, 7institution of higher education, association, society, or other body in state 8government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, that 9is entitled to expend moneys appropriated by law, including the legislature and the 10courts, and any authority created in subch. II of ch. 114 or in ch. 231, 233, 234, 235, 11238, or 279.AB1221,312Section 3. 13.62 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,3,5113.62 (2) “Agency” means any board, commission, department, office, society, 2institution of higher education, council, or committee in the state government, or 3any authority created in subch. II of ch. 114 or in ch. 231, 232, 233, 234, 235, 237, 4238, or 279, except that the term does not include a council or committee of the 5legislature.AB1221,46Section 4. 13.94 (4) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,3,23713.94 (4) (a) 1. Every state department, board, examining board, affiliated 8credentialing board, commission, independent agency, council or office in the 9executive branch of state government; all bodies created by the legislature in the 10legislative or judicial branch of state government; any public body corporate and 11politic created by the legislature including specifically the Fox River Navigational 12System Authority, the Lower Fox River Remediation Authority, the Wisconsin 13Aerospace Authority, the Wisconsin Public Food Administration Authority, the 14Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation, a professional baseball park 15district, a local professional football stadium district, a local cultural arts district 16and a long-term care district under s. 46.2895; every Wisconsin works agency under 17subch. III of ch. 49; every provider of medical assistance under subch. IV of ch. 49; 18technical college district boards; every county department under s. 51.42 or 51.437; 19every nonprofit corporation or cooperative or unincorporated cooperative 20association to which moneys are specifically appropriated by state law; and every 21corporation, institution, association or other organization which receives more than 2250 percent of its annual budget from appropriations made by state law, including 23subgrantee or subcontractor recipients of such funds.AB1221,524Section 5. 13.95 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,4,13113.95 Legislative fiscal bureau. (intro.) There is created a bureau to be 2known as the “Legislative Fiscal Bureau” headed by a director. The fiscal bureau 3shall be strictly nonpartisan and shall at all times observe the confidential nature 4of the research requests received by it; however, with the prior approval of the 5requester in each instance, the bureau may duplicate the results of its research for 6distribution. Subject to s. 230.35 (4) (a) and (f), the director or the director’s 7designated employees shall at all times, with or without notice, have access to all 8state agencies, the University of Wisconsin Hospitals and Clinics Authority, the 9Wisconsin Aerospace Authority, the Wisconsin Public Food Administration 10Authority, the Lower Fox River Remediation Authority, the Wisconsin Economic 11Development Corporation, and the Fox River Navigational System Authority, and to 12any books, records, or other documents maintained by such agencies or authorities 13and relating to their expenditures, revenues, operations, and structure.AB1221,614Section 6. 16.002 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,4,191516.002 (2) “Departments” means constitutional offices, departments, and 16independent agencies and includes all societies, associations, and other agencies of 17state government for which appropriations are made by law, but not including 18authorities created in subch. II of ch. 114 or in ch. 231, 232, 233, 234, 235, 237, 238, 19or 279.AB1221,720Section 7. 16.004 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,5,22116.004 (4) Freedom of access. The secretary and such employees of the 22department as the secretary designates may enter into the offices of state agencies 23and authorities created under subch. II of ch. 114 and under chs. 231, 233, 234, 235, 24237, 238, and 279, and may examine their books and accounts and any other matter 1that in the secretary’s judgment should be examined and may interrogate the 2agency’s employees publicly or privately relative thereto.AB1221,83Section 8. 16.004 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,5,8416.004 (5) Agencies and employees to cooperate. All state agencies and 5authorities created under subch. II of ch. 114 and under chs. 231, 233, 234, 235, 6237, 238, and 279, and their officers and employees, shall cooperate with the 7secretary and shall comply with every request of the secretary relating to his or her 8functions.AB1221,99Section 9. 16.004 (12) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,5,171016.004 (12) (a) In this subsection, “state agency” means an association, 11authority, board, department, commission, independent agency, institution, office, 12society, or other body in state government created or authorized to be created by the 13constitution or any law, including the legislature, the office of the governor, and the 14courts, but excluding the University of Wisconsin Hospitals and Clinics Authority, 15the Wisconsin Aerospace Authority, the Wisconsin Public Food Administration 16Authority, the Lower Fox River Remediation Authority, the Wisconsin Economic 17Development Corporation, and the Fox River Navigational System Authority.AB1221,1018Section 10. 16.01 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,5,241916.01 (1) In this section, “agency” means any office, department, agency, 20institution of higher education, association, society or other body in state 21government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law which 22is entitled to expend moneys appropriated by law, including the legislature and the 23courts, and any authority created under subch. II of ch. 114 or ch. 231, 233 or, 234, 24or 235.AB1221,111Section 11. 16.045 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,6,7216.045 (1) (a) “Agency” means an office, department, independent agency, 3institution of higher education, association, society, or other body in state 4government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, that 5is entitled to expend moneys appropriated by law, including the legislature and the 6courts, but not including an authority created in subch. II of ch. 114 or in ch. 231, 7232, 233, 234, 235, 237, 238, or 279.AB1221,128Section 12. 16.41 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,6,10916.41 (4) In this section, “authority” means a body created under subch. II of 10ch. 114 or under ch. 231, 233, 234, 235, 237, 238, or 279.AB1221,1311Section 13. 16.417 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,6,131216.417 (1) (b) “Authority” means a body created under subch. II of ch. 114 or 13ch. 231, 232, 233, 234, 235, 237, 238, or 279.AB1221,1414Section 14. 16.52 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,7,21516.52 (7) Petty cash account. With the approval of the secretary, each 16agency that is authorized to maintain a contingent fund under s. 20.920 may 17establish a petty cash account from its contingent fund. The procedure for 18operation and maintenance of petty cash accounts and the character of 19expenditures therefrom shall be prescribed by the secretary. In this subsection, 20“agency” means an office, department, independent agency, institution of higher 21education, association, society, or other body in state government created or 22authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, that is entitled to expend 23moneys appropriated by law, including the legislature and the courts, but not 1including an authority created in subch. II of ch. 114 or in ch. 231, 233, 234, 235, 2237, 238, or 279.AB1221,153Section 15. 16.528 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,7,9416.528 (1) (a) “Agency” means an office, department, independent agency, 5institution of higher education, association, society, or other body in state 6government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, that 7is entitled to expend moneys appropriated by law, including the legislature and the 8courts, but not including an authority created in subch. II of ch. 114 or in ch. 231, 9233, 234, 235, 237, 238, or 279.AB1221,1610Section 16. 16.53 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,7,191116.53 (2) Improper invoices. If an agency receives an improperly completed 12invoice, the agency shall notify the sender of the invoice within 10 working days 13after it receives the invoice of the reason it is improperly completed. In this 14subsection, “agency” means an office, department, independent agency, institution 15of higher education, association, society, or other body in state government created 16or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, that is entitled to expend 17moneys appropriated by law, including the legislature and the courts, but not 18including an authority created in subch. II of ch. 114 or in ch. 231, 233, 234, 235, 19237, 238, or 279.AB1221,1720Section 17. 16.54 (9) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,8,22116.54 (9) (a) 1. “Agency” means an office, department, independent agency, 22institution of higher education, association, society or other body in state 23government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, 24which is entitled to expend moneys appropriated by law, including the legislature 1and the courts, but not including an authority created in subch. II of ch. 114 or in 2ch. 231, 233, 234, 235, 237, 238, or 279.AB1221,183Section 18. 16.70 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,8,5416.70 (2) “Authority” means a body created under subch. II of ch. 114 or under 5ch. 231, 232, 233, 234, 235, 237, or 279.AB1221,196Section 19. 16.75 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,8,20716.75 (1m) The department shall award each order or contract for materials, 8supplies or equipment on the basis of life cycle cost estimates, whenever such action 9is appropriate. Each authority other than the University of Wisconsin Hospitals 10and Clinics Authority, the Lower Fox River Remediation Authority, and the 11Wisconsin Aerospace Authority, and the Wisconsin Public Food Administration 12Authority shall award each order or contract for materials, supplies or equipment 13on the basis of life cycle cost estimates, whenever such action is appropriate. The 14terms, conditions and evaluation criteria to be applied shall be incorporated in the 15solicitation of bids or proposals. The life cycle cost formula may include, but is not 16limited to, the applicable costs of energy efficiency, acquisition and conversion, 17money, transportation, warehousing and distribution, training, operation and 18maintenance and disposition or resale. The department shall prepare documents 19containing technical guidance for the development and use of life cycle cost 20estimates, and shall make the documents available to local governmental units.AB1221,2021Section 20. 16.765 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1221,9,82216.765 (1) Contracting agencies, the University of Wisconsin Hospitals and 23Clinics Authority, the Fox River Navigational System Authority, the Wisconsin 24Aerospace Authority, the Wisconsin Public Food Administration Authority, the 1Lower Fox River Remediation Authority, the Wisconsin Economic Development 2Corporation, and the Bradley Center Sports and Entertainment Corporation shall 3include in all contracts executed by them a provision obligating the contractor not to 4discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of age, 5race, religion, color, handicap, sex, physical condition, developmental disability as 6defined in s. 51.01 (5), sexual orientation as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), or national 7origin and, except with respect to sexual orientation, obligating the contractor to 8take affirmative action to ensure equal employment opportunities. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1221 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1221 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1221 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1221 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1221: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting